Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 36 Antitrust Law

6-36-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Antitrust Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-2.
Purpose — Rules of construction.

The purposes of this chapter are:

To complement the laws of the United States governing monopolistic and restrictive trade practices; and

To promote the unhampered growth of commerce and industry throughout the state by prohibiting unreasonable restraints of trade and monopolistic practices, inasmuch as these have the effect of hampering, preventing, or decreasing competition. It is intended, that as a result, the prices of goods and services to consumers will be fairly determined by free-market competition in activities affecting trade or commerce in this state, including the manufacturing, distribution, financing, and service sectors of the economy, except as otherwise provided by the statutes, regulations, and judicial decisions of this state. The general assembly intends to fully exercise its power to affect and regulate commerce in order to effectuate the purpose of this chapter.

This chapter shall be construed in harmony with judicial interpretations of comparable federal antitrust statutes insofar as practicable, except where provisions of this chapter are expressly contrary to applicable federal provisions as construed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 26.

6-36-3.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the following meanings:

“Commodity” means any goods, merchandise, wares, produce, chose in action, article of commerce, or any other tangible or intangible property, real, personal, or mixed, for use, consumption, enjoyment, or resale;

“Department” means the department of attorney general of this state;

“Documentary material” means any original or copy of any book, record, memorandum, paper communication, tabulation, map, chart, photograph, mechanical transcription, or other tangible document or recording;

“Investigative demand” or “demand” means an investigative demand pursuant to §

6-36-9(b)

;

“Person” means any natural person or the estate of any natural person; or trust or association of persons, whether formal or otherwise; or any corporation, partnership, company, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Public body” means the state of Rhode Island; any of its public agencies; cities and towns; its other political subdivisions; and other authorities;

“Service” means any kind of activity performed in whole or in part for financial gain including, but not limited to, personal services;

“Trade or commerce” means any economic activity of any type whatsoever involving any commodity or service or business activity whatsoever.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 26.

6-36-4.
Restraint of trade or commerce.

Every contract, combination, or conspiracy in restraint of, or to monopolize, trade or commerce is unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-5.
Establishment, maintenance, or use of monopoly power.

The establishment, maintenance, or use of a monopoly, or an attempt to establish a monopoly, of trade or commerce by any person, for the purpose of excluding competition or controlling, fixing, or maintaining prices, is unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-6.
Certain contracts unlawful.

A contract for the supplying of commodities or furnishing of services; or for the fixing of prices charged for the commodities or services; or for the giving or selling of a discount or rebate, on the condition, agreement, or understanding that one party shall not deal in the commodities or services of a competitor or competitors of the other party; is unlawful where the effect of the contract or the condition, agreement, or understanding may be to lessen competition or tend to create a monopoly in any line of commerce in any region of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 26.

6-36-7.
Scope of chapter.

This chapter applies to: (1) any contract, combination, or conspiracy, wherever created, formed, or entered into; (2) any establishment, maintenance, or use of monopoly power; and (3) any attempt or conspiracy to establish, maintain, or use monopoly power; wherever any of the foregoing has an impact on trade or commerce of this state sufficient to invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court.

In deciding whether conduct restrains or monopolizes trade or commerce or may substantially lessen competition within this state, determination of the relevant market or effective area of competition shall not be limited by the boundaries of this state. However, some portion of the relevant market or effective area of competition must be at least in part within this state.

No action or proceeding instituted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be barred on the ground that the activity or conduct complained of in any way affects or involves interstate or foreign commerce.

In any action under this chapter, the fact that a person or public body has not dealt directly with the defendant shall not bar or otherwise limit recovery. Provided, however, that courts shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in the action any amount of monetary relief which duplicates amounts which have been awarded for the same injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 365, § 1.

Artful Pleading Doctrine.

The artful pleading doctrine applies to support removal only when claims previously filed as federal claims in federal court are resubmitted in state court as state law claims: artful pleading doctrine would not apply when the plaintiff under the Rhode Island Antitrust Act raised claims that were not raised in prior federal litigation and therefore there were no claims for plaintiff to “resubmit” to the state court. Delta Dental v. Blue Cross & Blue Shield, 942 F. Supp. 740, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14413 (D.R.I. 1996).

6-36-8.
Exemptions.

Any activity or activities exempt from the provisions of the antitrust laws of the United States shall be similarly exempt from the provisions of this chapter. The exemptions shall be liberally construed in harmony with federal statutes and ruling judicial interpretations of the United States courts, with due regard for the need to exempt conduct otherwise exempt under federal law but for the absence of any nexus with interstate commerce, except where the provisions of this chapter are expressly contrary to applicable federal provisions as construed. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to apply to activities or arrangements approved by any regulatory body or officer acting under statutory authority of this state or of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-9.
Investigation by attorney general.

General power of investigation. Whenever it appears to the attorney general, upon reasonable cause, that any person has engaged in, engages in, or is about to engage in any act or practice prohibited by this chapter; or that any person has assisted or participated in any plan, scheme, agreement, or combination of the nature prohibited by this chapter; or whenever the attorney general believes it to be in the public interest that an investigation be made; he or she may, in his or her discretion, either require or permit the complainant to file with the attorney general a statement in writing under oath or otherwise as to all facts and circumstances concerning the subject matter that the attorney general believes to be in the public interest to investigate. The attorney general may also require any other data and information from the complainant that he or she deems relevant and may make any special and independent investigations that he or she deems necessary in connection with the matter. In addition, the attorney general may take any measures that will not violate due process of law to preserve the confidentiality of the complainant’s identity.

Investigative demand.

Whenever the attorney general has reason to believe that any person may have knowledge or be in possession, custody, or control of any documentary material pertinent to an investigation of a possible violation of this chapter, the attorney general may issue in writing and cause to be served upon the person an investigative demand by which the attorney general may:

Compel the attendance of the person and require him or her to submit to examination and give testimony under oath;

Require the production of documentary material pertinent to the investigation for inspection or copying; and/or

Require answer to written interrogatories to be furnished under oath.

The power to issue investigative demands shall neither abate nor terminate by reason of the bringing of any action or proceeding under this chapter. The attorney general may issue successive investigative demands to the same person in order to obtain additional information pertinent to an ongoing investigation.

Contents of investigative demand. Each investigative demand shall:

State the section or sections of the chapter the alleged violation of which is under investigation and the general subject matter of this investigation;

Prescribe a reasonable return date no less than forty (40) days after service of the investigative demand, provided that an earlier date may be prescribed under compelling circumstances, but in no event less than twenty (20) days;

Specify the time and place at which the person is to appear and give testimony; produce documentary material; and furnish answers to interrogatories; or do any or a combination of these things;

Describe by class any documentary material required to be produced so as to clearly indicate what is demanded; and

Contain any interrogatories to which written answers under oath are required.

Prohibition against unreasonable demand. No investigative demand shall:

Contain any requirement that would be unreasonable or improper if contained in a subpoena issued by a court of this state; or

Require the disclosure of any material or information that would be privileged, or which for any other reason would not be required to be disclosed by a subpoena issued by a court of this state, including, but not limited to, trade secrets or confidential scientific, technical, merchandising, production, management, or commercial information, to the extent that the material or information is protected pursuant to the rules of civil procedure of the superior court.

Offer of documentary evidence. Where the information requested upon oral examination or written interrogatory pursuant to an investigative demand may be derived or ascertained from the business records of the person upon whom the demand has been served; or from an examination, audit, or inspection of the business records; or from a compilation, abstract, or summary based on the records; and the burden of deriving or ascertaining the answer is substantially the same for the attorney general as for the person from whom the information is requested, it is sufficient for that person to specify the records from which the answer may be derived or ascertained and to afford the attorney general reasonable opportunity to examine, audit, or inspect the records and to make copies, compilations, abstracts, or summaries.

Service of investigative demand. An investigative demand may be served by any means provided under the Rhode Island rules of civil procedure for service of a complaint in a civil action.

Motion to quash. Within forty (40) days after the service of an investigative demand or at any time before the return date specified in the demand, whichever period is shorter, the person served may file in a state superior court and serve upon the attorney general a petition for an order of court modifying or setting aside the demand. The time allowed for compliance in whole or part with the demand as deemed proper and ordered by the court shall not run while the petition is pending before the court. The petition shall specify each ground upon which the petitioner relies in seeking relief, and may be based upon any failure of the demand to comply with the provisions of this chapter or upon any constitutional or other legal right, privilege, or qualified privilege of the party, including that the material or information sought constitutes trade secrets or confidential scientific, technical, merchandising, production, management, or commercial information. If qualified privilege is raised, the court may order the person to comply with the demand only upon showing of particularized need and subject to an appropriate protective order. The provisions of this subsection shall be the sole and exclusive means for challenging the requirements of a demand.

Those authorized to examine. The examination of all persons pursuant to this section shall be conducted by the attorney general or a representative designated in writing by him or her before an officer authorized to administer oaths in this state. The statements made shall be taken down stenographically or by a sound recording device and shall be transcribed.

Right of persons served with investigative demands.

Any person required to attend and give testimony or to submit documentary material pursuant to this section shall be entitled to retain or, on payment of lawfully prescribed cost, to procure a copy of any document he or she produces and of his or her own statements as transcribed.

Any person compelled to appear under a demand for oral testimony pursuant to this section may be accompanied, represented, and advised by counsel. Counsel may advise the person in confidence, either upon the request of the person or upon counsel’s own initiative, with respect to any question asked of the person. The person or counsel may object on the record to any question, in whole or part, and shall briefly state for the record the reason for the objection. An objection may properly be made, received, and entered upon the record when it is claimed that the person is entitled to refuse to answer the question on grounds of any constitutional or other legal right or privilege, including the privilege against self incrimination. The person shall not otherwise object to or refuse to answer any question, and shall not by him or herself or through counsel otherwise interrupt the oral examination. If the person refuses to answer any question, the attorney general may petition the superior court for an order compelling the person to answer the question.

The information and materials supplied to the attorney general pursuant to an investigative demand shall not be permitted to become public or disclosed by the attorney general or his or her employees beyond the extent necessary for antitrust enforcement purposes in the public interest.

Upon the completion of a case brought under this chapter, the attorney general shall return any documents, answers, and transcripts, and all copies of the material that have not passed into the control of the court through their introduction into the record, to the person who provided the documents, answers, or testimony. If no case in which the material may be used has been commenced within a reasonable time after completion of the examination or analysis of all documentary material, but in no event later than two (2) years after production of the documentary material, the attorney general shall, upon written request of the person who produced the material, return all documents, answers, and transcripts, and all copies of the material, to the person who provided them.

The attorney general shall have the authority, at any time, to modify or revoke any civil investigative demand and to stipulate to protective orders with respect to documents and information submitted in response to a demand. The protective orders may include provisions appropriate to the full and adequate protection of trade secrets.

Witness expenses. All persons served with an investigative demand, other than those persons whose conduct or practices are being investigated, or any officer, director, or person in the employment of the person under investigation, shall be paid the same fees and mileage as paid witnesses in the courts of this state. No person shall be excused from attending the inquiry pursuant to the mandate of an investigative demand; from giving testimony; from producing documentary material; or from being required to answer questions on the ground of failure to tender or pay a witness fee or mileage unless demand for the fees or mileage is made at the time testimony is about to be taken and unless payment is not made upon demand.

Refusal of witness to testify or produce documents. Any person who shall neglect or refuse to attend and give testimony or to answer any lawful inquiry or to produce documentary material, if in his or her power to do so, in obedience to an investigative demand pursuant to this section, may be adjudged in civil contempt by the superior court until the time that he or she purges him or herself of contempt by testifying, producing documentary material, or presenting written answers as ordered. Any person who commits perjury or false swearing in response to an investigative demand pursuant to this section shall be punishable pursuant to the provisions of chapter 33 of title 11.

Duty to testify immunity.

If, in any investigation brought by the attorney general pursuant to this section, any individual shall refuse to attend; to give testimony; to produce documentary material; or to answer a written interrogatory in obedience to an investigative demand, or under order of court, on the ground that the testimony or material required of him or her may tend to incriminate him or her, that person may be ordered to attend and to give testimony; to produce documentary material; or to answer the written interrogatory; or to do an applicable combination of these. The order as previously stated shall be an order of court given after a hearing in which the attorney general has established a need for the grant of immunity as provided in this subsection.

The attorney general may petition any superior court justice for an order as described in subdivision (l)(1). The petition shall set forth the nature of the investigation and the need for the immunization of the witness.

Testimony so compelled shall not be used against the witness as evidence in any criminal proceedings against him or her in any court. However, the grant of immunity shall not immunize the witness from civil liability arising from the transactions about which testimony is given, and he or she may nevertheless be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for any perjury, false swearing, or contempt committed in answering, or in failing to answer, or in producing evidence, or failing to do so, in accordance with the order. If a person refuses to testify after being granted immunity from prosecution and after being ordered to testify as previously stated, he or she may be adjudged in civil contempt by the superior court until the time that he or she purges him or herself of contempt by testifying; producing documentary material; or presenting written answers as ordered. The foregoing shall not prevent the attorney general from instituting other appropriate contempt proceedings against any person who violates any of the above provisions.

Duty of public officials. It shall be the duty of all officials of this state and its public bodies, their deputies, assistants, clerks, subordinates, or employees, and all other persons to render and furnish to the attorney general when so requested all information and assistance in their possession or within their power.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 26.

6-36-10.
Injunction against and civil penalties for violations of this chapter.

Jurisdiction of courts. The superior court of this state shall have jurisdiction to prevent and restrain violations of this chapter, provided that the statutory minimum amount in controversy is properly present. In addition to granting prohibitory injunctions and other restraints for a period and upon terms and conditions necessary to deter the defendant from, and insure against, the committing of future violations of this chapter, the courts may grant mandatory injunctions reasonably necessary to dissipate the ill effects of the violation. The courts may issue appropriate decrees upon consent and stipulation by the parties. The courts may also issue restraining orders. Under no circumstances shall the state or a public body be required to post bond in any action under this chapter.

Right to injunctive relief.

The attorney general may institute proceedings to prevent and restrain violations of this chapter as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

Any person or public body including the United States, whether a direct or indirect purchaser, may institute proceedings for injunctive relief, temporary or permanent, as provided in subsection (a) of this section, against threatened loss or damage to his or her property or business by a violation of this chapter. A preliminary injunction may be issued upon a showing that the danger of irreparable loss or damage is immediate and, within the court’s discretion, the execution of proper bond against damages for an injunction improvidently granted. If the court issues a permanent injunction, the plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees, filing fees, and reasonable costs of the suit. Reasonable costs for the suit may include, but shall not be limited to, the expenses of discovery and document reproduction.

Civil penalty. In addition to injunctive relief authorized pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section, any person who violates this chapter may be liable for a civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 365, § 1.

6-36-11.
Enforcement.

Action for treble damages. Any person or public body, including the United States, injured in his or her business or property by reason of a violation of the provisions of this chapter may sue in superior court and shall recover threefold the damages sustained by him or her, together with reasonable costs of suit and any reasonable attorneys’ fees that may be granted at the discretion of the court. The reasonable costs of suit may include, but shall not be limited to, the expenses of discovery and document reproduction. In any action under this section the fact that a person or public body has not dealt directly with the defendant shall not bar or otherwise limit recovery. Provided, however, that the court shall exclude from the amount of the damages awarded in the action, any amount of monetary relief that duplicates amounts that have been awarded for the same injury, but shall not exclude reasonable costs and attorneys’ fees.

Action by attorney general. The attorney general shall investigate suspected violations of the provisions of this chapter and if he or she shall conclude that a violation is imminent, is occurring, or has occurred, he or she may institute on behalf of the state of Rhode Island or any of its departments, subdivisions, agencies, or its cities and towns, an action in superior court seeking appropriate relief. The attorney general may bring an action in federal court on behalf of the state of Rhode Island; any of its political subdivisions or agencies; or its cities and towns to recover the damages provided for by the federal antitrust laws, and pursuant to the federal laws may undertake any measures that he or she deems necessary for the successful conduct of the action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 365, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 26.

6-36-12.
Attorney general — Suits parens patriae.

The attorney general may bring a civil action in superior court in the name of the state, as parens patriae on behalf of persons residing in this state, to secure monetary relief as provided in this section for injuries sustained by the persons to their property by reason of any violation of this chapter. This parens patriae action shall take precedence, have priority status, and automatically stay any other action by a city or town in superior court seeking monetary relief for the same injuries sustained by the persons to their property by reason of any violation of this chapter. The court shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in this action any amount of monetary relief:

That duplicates amounts that have been awarded for the same injury; or

That is properly allocable to persons who have excluded their claims pursuant to subsection (c)(1) of this section.

The court shall award the state as monetary relief threefold the total damage sustained as described in subsection (a) of this section and the costs of suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee.

In any action brought under subsection (a) of this section, the attorney general shall, at the times, in the manner, and with the content that the court may direct, cause notice of the action to be given by publication.

Any person on whose behalf an action is brought under subsection (a) may elect to exclude from adjudication the portion of the state claim for monetary relief attributable to him or her by filing notice of the election with the court within the time specified in the notice given pursuant to subsection (c)(1) of this section.

The final judgment in an action under subsection (a) shall be res judicata as to any claim under §

6-36-11

by any person on behalf of whom the action was brought and who fails to give the notice within the period specified in the notice given pursuant to subsection (c)(1) of this section.

An action under subsection (a) shall not be dismissed or compromised without the approval of the court and notice of any proposed dismissal or compromise shall be given by publication at the times, in the manner, and with the content that the court may direct.

In any action under subsection (a):

The amount of the plaintiff’s attorney’s fees, if any, shall be determined by the court and any attorney’s fees awarded to the attorney general shall be deposited with the state as general revenues; and

The court may, in its discretion, award a reasonable attorney’s fee to a prevailing defendant upon a finding that the attorney general has acted in bad faith, vexatiously, wantonly, or for oppressive reasons.

Monetary relief recovered in an action under this section shall: (1) Be distributed in any manner that the court in its discretion may authorize; or (2) Be deemed a civil penalty by the court and deposited with the state as general revenues; subject in either case to the requirement that any distribution procedure adopted afford each person a reasonable opportunity to secure his or her appropriate portion of the net monetary relief.

In any action under this section the fact that a person or public body has not dealt directly with the defendant shall not bar or otherwise limit recovery. Provided, however, that the court shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in the action any amount of monetary relief that duplicates amounts that have been awarded for the same injury. No provision of this chapter shall be construed to limit the standing of any person or public body, whether the person or public body is a direct or indirect purchaser, from bringing suit on his or her own behalf.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 365, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 26.

6-36-13.
Proof of aggregate damages.

In any action brought by the attorney general under either §

6-36-11

or

6-36-12

, the attorney general may recover aggregate damages sustained by the public bodies and by the citizens and residents of this state as respectively their interests shall appear in the case, without separately proving the claims of each of them; and his or her proof of the damages may be based upon statistical sampling methods, the pro rata allocation of excess profits to sales of other transactions occurring wholly or partially within this state or, any other reasonable system of estimating aggregate damages that the court in its discretion may permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-14.
Agreements with other plaintiffs — Settlements — Cooperation with other governments — Division of antitrust.

In any action brought by the attorney general pursuant either to this chapter or to the federal antitrust laws, or both, for the recovery of damages or other proper relief, the attorney general may enter into agreements relating to the investigation and litigation of the action with any other party plaintiff who has brought a similar action and with whom the attorney general finds it advantageous to act jointly or to share common expenses or to cooperate in any manner relative to the action. The attorney general may enter settlements with defendants that provide for the payment of money to plaintiffs.

The attorney general may cooperate with officials of the federal government and of the several states in the investigation and enforcement of violations to the end that implementation of this chapter will be accomplished in the most equitable and efficient manner possible.

The attorney general may establish a division of antitrust within the department of attorney general to enforce this chapter, and he or she may employ any assistant attorneys general, special assistant attorneys general, economic analysts, investigators, and clerical staff that may be required to support the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-15.
Common law powers.

No provision of this chapter shall be construed to limit the common law powers of the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-16.
Criminal penalties — Consent decrees.

Fines and penalties. Any person or corporation, or any officer or agent of any person or corporation, who shall knowingly violate the provisions of this chapter or knowingly aid in or advise a violation, or who, as principal, manager, director, stockholder owning ten percent (10%) or more of the aggregate outstanding capital stock of all classes of the corporation, agent, servant, or employee, knowingly does any act comprising part of a violation, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one million dollars ($1,000,000) if a corporation, or, if a natural person, by not more than three (3) years imprisonment or by a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or both imprisonment and fine, in the discretion of the court.

Consent decrees. The attorney general may petition the court for entry of a consent decree dismissing any criminal prosecution under this chapter, but the court shall review the proceeding to determine whether entry of a consent decree dismissing any criminal prosecution is in the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-17.
Forfeiture of charter rights and privileges to do business.

Upon the failure of any person to comply with the terms of a final judgment or decree rendered by a court of this state issued for a violation of the provisions of this chapter, or to comply with a consent settlement approved by a court of this state concerning an alleged violation of this chapter, the attorney general may apply to the court:

For the forfeiture of any charter rights, franchise privileges, or powers of the corporation held by the person under the laws of this state;

For dissolution, if the person is a corporation or limited partnership organized under the laws of this state; or

For the suspension of the privilege to conduct business within this state.

The court, after giving due consideration to the public interest and to relevant competitive and economic circumstances, may grant so much of the requested relief as is deemed appropriate. Dissolution shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures specified by law for either voluntary or judicial dissolution of the particular type of corporation, association, firm, or partnership.

If any corporation, association, partnership, or limited partnership shall be dissolved or have its privilege to transact business in this state suspended or revoked as provided in subsection (a) of this section, no assignee, transferee, or successor in interest of the corporation, association, partnership, or limited partnership shall be permitted to incorporate or to transact business in this state without first applying to the court for and receiving an order permitting incorporation or transaction of business. No order shall be granted unless the applicant proves to the satisfaction of the court that it will conduct its affairs in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-18.
Acts of officers, directors, representatives, or agents acting within the scope of their authority.

A corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership is liable for the acts of its officers, directors, representatives, or agents acting within the scope of their authority. Proof of the acts of any officer, director, representative, or agent shall be received as prima facie proof of the acts of the corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership itself.

When a corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership violates this chapter, the violation shall be deemed to be that of the individual directors, members, officers, managers, employees, or agents of the corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership who knowingly authorized, ordered, aided, abetted, or advised in the acts or omissions constituting in whole or in part the violation, whether the individuals acted on their own behalf and for their own benefit, or for the corporation, association, firm, partnership, or limited partnership and in their representative capacity. The individuals, in their capacity as individuals, are subject to the provisions of this chapter and may be joined, if subject to personal jurisdiction, as additional parties defendant in the proceedings against the corporation, association, partnership, or limited partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-19.
Proof of conspiracy or combination.

In a prosecution under this chapter, it shall be sufficient to prove that a conspiracy or combination exists, and that the defendant or defendants belong to it or acted for or in connection with it, without proving all members belonging to it, or providing or producing any article or agreement or any written instrument on which it may be based, or that it was evidenced by any written instrument at all.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-20.
Judgment in favor of state as prima facie evidence.

A final judgment or decree rendered in any civil or criminal proceeding under this chapter brought by or on behalf of the state of Rhode Island, any of its departments or agencies, or any of its political subdivisions to the effect that a defendant has violated this chapter shall be prima facie evidence against the defendant in any action or proceeding as to all matters respecting which the judgment or decree would be an estoppel as between the parties to it; provided, however, this section shall not apply to consent judgments or decrees entered before any testimony has been taken.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-21.
Notification of civil action.

Upon commencement of any civil action by a person, other than the attorney general, for a violation of this chapter, the plaintiff shall mail a copy of the complaint to the attorney general and shall file proof of service on the attorney general with the court. The civil action may not proceed until the proof of service is filed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-22.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The attorney general shall, from time to time, promulgate rules and regulations prescribing procedures for the implementation and effectuation of his or her powers and authority under this chapter in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-23.
Limitation of actions.

Any action brought to enforce the provisions of this chapter shall be barred unless commenced within four (4) years after the cause of action arose, or if the cause of action is based upon a conspiracy in violation of this chapter, within four (4) years after the plaintiff discovered, or by the exercise of reasonable diligence should have discovered, the facts relied upon for proof of the conspiracy. No cause of action barred on July 1, 1979, shall be revived by this chapter. For purposes of this section, a cause of action for a continuing violation is deemed to arise at any time during the period of the violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 26.

6-36-24.
Suspension of limitation.

Whenever any civil or criminal proceedings shall be commenced by the state to prevent, restrain, or punish a violation of this chapter, the running of the statute of limitations in respect to every private right of action arising under this chapter and based in whole or in part on any matter complained of in the proceeding shall be suspended during the pendency of the action and for one year thereafter; provided, however, that whenever the running of the statute of limitations with respect to a cause of action arising under either §

6-36-10

or §

6-36-11

or both shall be suspended under this section, any action to enforce the section shall be forever barred unless commenced either within the period of suspension or within four (4) years after the cause of action accrued, whichever is later.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 26.

6-36-25.
Remedies cumulative.

The remedies provided in this chapter are cumulative of each other and of existing powers and remedies inherent in the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.

6-36-26.
Severability.

If any provision or phrases of this chapter or applications of any provision or phrases of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or phrases or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or phrase or application, and to this end the provisions and phrases of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 98, § 1.